Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 1 General Provisions
4-11-9.8.
Recoupment of expenses of impoundment; process.

Any agency impounding one or more animals as part of any investigation of a violation of Code Section 4-11-9.2, 16-12-4, or 16-12-37, or otherwise providing care for one or more animals impounded pursuant to this article, may file a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction to hear civil cases requesting the court to require the owner of the animal or animals to pay into the registry of such court funds in an amount sufficient to secure payment of all anticipated costs of impoundment and care.

Every such petition shall contain a description of the time, place, and circumstances of the impoundment, the legal authority for same, and the name and address of the owner of the animal or animals impounded.

Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other sworn peace officer shall personally serve written process of the petition on the owner of the animal or animals. If the officer is unable to personally serve written process of the petition on the owner of the animal or animals within 30 days of the date of filing of the petition, the officer shall within ten days thereafter post a copy of the petition on the door of the residence of the owner or in another conspicuous place at the location where the animal or animals were impounded.

Upon the court’s receipt of return of service of process of the petition on the owner, the court shall set a hearing on the petition to determine the need to care for and provide for the animal or animals pending the final disposition of the animal or animals. The hearing shall be conducted no less than ten and no more than 15 business days after the court’s receipt of return of service of process of the petition on the owner. Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other sworn peace officer shall be authorized to serve written notice on the owner of the date, time, and location of the hearing. If no name and address for the owner are set forth in the petition, then such notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the location where the animal or animals were impounded.

The scope of the hearing shall be limited to whether the impounding of the animal or animals was authorized. Upon such a showing, the court shall require payment into the registry of the court of an amount sufficient to cover all costs of impoundment and care, as determined by the court, for a period beginning as of the date of impoundment and ending 30 days after the date of the order. Neither the result of a hearing provided for under this subsection nor a statement of an owner made at any such hearing shall be admissible in any criminal prosecution related to the impoundment of the animal or animals.

The owner shall be ordered to deposit an amount equal to the portion of the original deposit amount attributable to the first 30 days after the date of the initial order every 30 days thereafter until the owner relinquishes the animal or animals or until final disposition of the animal or animals. If the required funds are not deposited within five days of the original order setting the amount of the funds, or within five days after the expiration of each applicable subsequent 30 day period, then the animal or animals shall be forfeited to the petitioning agency by operation of law and may, with the consent of any prosecutor prosecuting charges against the owner regarding the owner’s animal or animals, be disposed of pursuant to Code Section 4-11-9.6.

At any time before the final disposition of the animal or animals, the owner may relinquish ownership of the animal or animals. All costs of impoundment and care for the animal or animals from the date of impoundment to the date of the relinquishment shall be paid by the owner unless the owner meets the requirements set forth in paragraph (5) of this subsection.

In circumstances where only one animal was impounded, and the owner of the animal is, at the initial hearing or at an adjustment hearing, able to prove indigency as described in Chapter 12 of Title 17, the court, in its discretion, may reduce or waive the requirement for the owner to pay costs of impoundment and care pursuant to this Code section.

The court may correct, alter, or otherwise adjust the owner’s 30 day obligation of payment upon a motion made by the owner or petitioning agency at least five days before the expiration date of the then current 30 day payment period. The hearing shall be held within ten days of service of the motion on the opposite party, and any adjustment to the 30 day payment amount shall become effective five days after the court orders, or refuses to order, an adjustment.

Upon the payment of funds into the court registry in accordance with this Code section, the petitioning agency may immediately begin to draw from those funds for payment of the actual costs incurred by the petitioning agency in keeping and caring for the animal or animals from the date of impoundment to the date of the final disposition of the underlying criminal action regarding the owner and the animal or animals.

Upon final disposition of the animal or animals, remaining funds deposited with the clerk of the court shall be refunded to the owner.

In the event that an owner is adjudicated not guilty of all charges specified in a petition filed pursuant to this Code section, such owner may request from the agency that filed the petition a refund of all costs paid by the owner pursuant to such petition. In making any such claim for refund, the procedures provided in Code Section 48-5-380 shall apply.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-9.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 178, § 6/SB 356.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2016.

4-11-10.
Unlawful acts by licensed persons.

It shall be unlawful for any person licensed under this article or any person employed by a person licensed under this article or under such person’s supervision or control to:

Commit a violation of Code Section 16-12-4, relating to cruelty to animals;

Fail to keep the pet dealership premises, animal shelter, kennel, or stable in a good state of repair, in a clean and sanitary condition, adequately ventilated, or disinfected when needed;

Fail to provide humane care for any animal; or

Fail to take reasonable care to release for sale, trade, or adoption only those animals that appear to be free of disease, injuries, or abnormalities.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

4-11-11.
Shipment or importation of equines, poultry, livestock, or birds into state without official certificate of veterinary inspection.

It shall be unlawful for any person to ship or import any equines, poultry, livestock, or birds into this state unless accompanied by an official interstate or international certificate of veterinary inspection.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall be unlawful to ship or import into this state any other type of animal which the commissioner has determined poses a significant risk of disease to domestic animals or humans within this state unless such animal is accompanied by such certificate. The commissioner shall maintain on the department website a listing of all other types of animals determined to pose a significant risk of disease in accordance with this subsection.

No such certificate shall be required for poultry originating from flocks participating in the National Poultry Improvement Plan administered by the United States Department of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1455, § 1/SB 175.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, designated the previously undesignated language as subsection (a), and rewrote subsection (a), which previously read: “It shall be unlawful for any person to ship any animal, other than equines, livestock, birds, cold-blooded animals, and rodents, into this state for the purpose of resale unless such animal is accompanied by a U.S. interstate or international certificate of health.”; and added subsections (b) and (c).

4-11-12.
Cooperation with federal government.

The Commissioner may cooperate with the secretary of agriculture in carrying out Public Law 89-544, commonly known as the Animal Welfare Act, as amended by Public Laws 91-579 and 94-279, and the rules and regulations issued by the secretary of agriculture under that act. The Commissioner may promulgate regulations to facilitate cooperation and avoid any unnecessary duplication or conflict of activities by the department and the secretary of agriculture in regulating the activities or areas covered by this article and Public Law 89-544. The regulations may be in addition to other regulations authorized by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 4/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “secretary of agriculture” for “United States Secretary of Agriculture” at the beginning of the first sentence and revised language in the first and second sentences.

U.S. Code.

The Animal Welfare Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. §§ 2131-2155.

4-11-13.
Animals raised, kept, or maintained for human consumption.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any person who raises, keeps, or maintains animals solely for the purposes of human consumption.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1.

4-11-14.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1.

4-11-15.
Injunctions and restraining orders.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article or elsewhere in the laws of this state and notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law, the Commissioner or, where authorized by the local governing authority, the city or county attorney is authorized to apply to the superior court for an injunction or restraining order. The court shall for good cause shown grant a temporary or permanent injunction or an ex parte or restraining order, restraining or enjoining any person, partnership, firm, corporation, or other entity from violating and continuing to violate this article, any rules and regulations promulgated under this article, Code Section 16-12-4, or Code Section 16-12-37. Such injunction or restraining order shall be issued without bond and may be granted notwithstanding the fact that the violation constitutes a criminal act and notwithstanding the pendency of any criminal prosecution for the same violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

4-11-15.1.
Abandonment of domesticated animal.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 4-11-13, it shall be unlawful for any person knowingly and intentionally to abandon any domesticated animal upon any public or private property or public right of way. This Code section shall not be construed as amending or otherwise affecting the provisions of Chapter 3 of this title, relating to livestock running at large or straying.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-15.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

Cross references.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

Law reviews.

For comment, “The Abuse of Animals as a Method of Domestic Violence:
The Need for Criminalization,” see 63 Emory L.J. 1163 (2014).

4-11-16.
Penalties.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 16-12-4 or 16-12-37, any person violating any of the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in Code Section 17-10-3; provided, however, that if such offense is committed by a corporation, such corporation shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 for each such violation, community service of not less than 200 hours nor more than 500 hours, or both.

Each violation of this article shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

4-11-17.
Filing a report regarding animal cruelty; immunity.

Notwithstanding Code Section 24-12-31 or any other provision of law to the contrary, any licensed veterinarian or veterinary technician having reasonable cause to believe that an animal has been subjected to animal cruelty in violation of Code Section 16-12-4 or an act prohibited under Code Section 16-12-37 may make or cause to be made a report of such violation to the Commissioner, his or her designee, an animal control officer, a law enforcement agency, or a prosecuting attorney and may appear and testify in any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning the care of an animal.

Any person participating in the making of a report pursuant to this Code section or participating in any administrative or judicial proceeding pursuant to this article or Title 16 shall, in so doing, be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, provided such participation pursuant to this Code section or any other law is made in good faith.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 10; Ga. L. 2008, p. 114, § 2-4/HB 301; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 3/HB 24.

The 2011 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Code Section 24-12-31” for “Code Section 24-9-29” near the beginning of subsection (a). See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

4-11-18.
Article cumulative; does not prohibit enactment and enforcement of local ordinances by municipal or county governing authority.

This article shall be cumulative and shall not prohibit the enactment and enforcement of local ordinances by a municipal or county governing authority on this subject which are not in conflict with this article; provided, however, that a municipal or county governing authority shall be required to provide timely written notice to the department of any enforcement action taken pursuant to such an ordinance against an operator licensed under this article who is alleged to be in violation of such local ordinance. The department shall be notified of the initiation of any such local enforcement action and of the final conclusions or ultimate outcome of any such action.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-11-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1419, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, Code Section 4-11-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1419, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 4-11-18.